Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB16.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 205.520 is amended to read as follows:
(1) KRS 205.510 to 205.630 shall be known as the "Medical Assistance Act."
(2) The General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky recognizes and declares
that it is an essential function, duty, and responsibility of the state government to
provide medical care to its indigent citizenry; and it is the purpose of KRS 205.510
to 205.630 to provide such care.
(3) Further, it is the policy of the Commonwealth to:
(a) Take advantage of federal funds that may be available for medical assistance.
To qualify for federal funds, the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services may, except as provided in KRS 205.5372, by regulation
comply with any requirement that may be imposed or opportunity that may be
presented by federal law. Nothing in KRS 205.510 to 205.630 is intended to
limit the secretary's power in this respect; and
(b) Provide Medicaid eligibility for all residents of the Commonwealth who may
be eligible for medical assistance under 42 U.S.C. sec.
1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VII) and (e)(14).
(4) It is the intention of the General Assembly to comply with the provisions of Title
XIX of the Social Security Act which require that the Kentucky Medical Assistance
Program recover from third parties which have a legal liability to pay for care and
services paid by the Kentucky Medical Assistance Program.
(5) The Kentucky Medical Assistance Program shall be the payor of last resort and its
right to recover under KRS 205.622 to 205.630 shall be superior to any right of
reimbursement, subrogation, or indemnity of any liable third party.
Section 2. KRS 205.6312 is amended to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any state law to the contrary, the cabinet or a managed care organization
Page 1 of 2
BR130200.100 - 1302 - XXXX 1/14/2026 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1302
contracted by the cabinet to provide Medicaid services pursuant to this chapter shall [not
]institute copayments, cost sharing, or similar charges to be paid by any medical
assistance recipients, their spouses, or parents, for any assistance provided pursuant to
this chapter, federal law, or any federal Medicaid waiver only to the extent required
under federal law, including but not limited to 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396o(k).
Section 3. Within 30 days after the effective date of this Act, the Governor shall
commission an independent third-party analysis of the current Medicaid expansion and
the Kentucky Health Benefit Exchange. The analysis shall also investigate Kentucky's
uninsured rate, access to care, and any improvements in health indicators.
Section 4. If the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or the Department for
Medicaid Services determines that a state plan amendment, waiver, or any other form of
authorization or approval from any federal agency to implement Section 1 or 2 of this Act
is necessary to prevent the loss of federal funds or to comply with federal law, the cabinet
or department:
(1) Shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this Act, request the necessary
federal authorization or approval to implement Sections 1 and 2 of this Act; and
(2) May only delay implementation of the provisions of Sections 1 and 2 of this
Act for which federal authorization or approval was deemed necessary until the federal
authorization or approval is granted.
Section 5. Sections 1, 2, and 4 of this Act shall constitute the specific
authorization required under KRS 205.5372(1).
Page 2 of 2
BR130200.100 - 1302 - XXXX 1/14/2026 9:39 AM Jacketed